Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 35.02, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Members; officers. The board has deleted text begin sevendeleted text end new text begin 11new text end members appointed by the governor with deleted text begin the advice and consent of the senate, three of whom are producers of livestock in the state; one of whom is a member of a federally recognized Tribe located in Minnesota who is experienced in animal husbandry; and three of whom are practicing veterinarians licensed in Minnesota, one of whom specializes in companion animalsdeleted text end new text begin two at-large members, one member who is a member of a federally recognized Tribe located in Minnesota, and eight regional members, with no two regional members residing in the same congressional district. Members must be knowledgeable in animal agriculture, animal health, or pets and companion animals, with at least two members who represent the public and are not employed in agriculture, veterinary medicine, the pet industry, or a related fieldnew text end . To the extent practicable, the governor's appointments must achieve gender and geographic balance among the board membership. The commissioners of agriculture, natural resources, and health, the dean of the College of Veterinary Medicine, and the director of the Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory of the University of Minnesota deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin shallnew text end serve as consultants to the board without vote. Appointments to fill unexpired terms must be made from the classes to which the retiring members belong. The board shall elect a president and a vice-president from among its members deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin . The governor shall appointnew text end a veterinarian licensed in Minnesota who is not a member to be deleted text begin itsdeleted text end new text begin the board'snew text end executive director for a term of one year and until a successor qualifies. The board shall set the duties of the director. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026, and applies to appointments that occur on or after that date. new text end